West Virginia, session 2025, HB2310.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Occupational Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 4, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-26 of this code, modified by the Board of Occupational Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 29, 2024, relating to the Board of Occupational Therapy (telehealth practice requirements and definitions, 13 CSR 09), is authorized.